Idaho, session 2025, H0467.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 20, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 20-101E, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
20-101E. REHABILITATION ACHIEVEMENTS -- CREDITS TOWARD A REDUCTION OF
SENTENCE. (1) Each person convicted of an offense against the state commit-
ted on or after July 1, 1986, sentenced, and confined in a state correctional
facility for any term other than life or a sentence of death, subject to the
limitations as provided in this section, may be awarded a reduction of the
indeterminate portion of such person's sentence or term of felony probation
or parole based on prosocial behavior and accomplishments that support reen-
try and desistance from crime.
(a) Prosocial behavior incentive. The director may grant credit to-
ward a reduction of sentence for remaining free from disciplinary ac-
tion. Credit for prosocial behavior shall not exceed a total of ten (10)
days for each month the individual serves. An individual shall lose ac-
cess to such credit incentive for thirty (30) days following a disci-
plinary action.
(b) Rehabilitation. The director may award credit toward a reduction
of sentence based on an individual's demonstrated commitment to reha-
bilitation achievement as follows:
Rehabilitation Achievement Credits not to Exceed
Participation in drug and alcohol Eighteen (18) days per one-month
treatment engagement
Participation in behavioral Eighteen (18) days per one-month
modification, self-improvement, and engagement
life-skills programming
Pursuing and maintaining a volunteer Twenty (20) days per one-month
position engagement


Pursuing and maintaining employment Twenty (20) days per one-month
engagement
Participation in other department- Fifteen (15) days per one-month
approved programming engagement
(c) Credit for rehabilitation achievement shall not exceed a total of
twenty (20) days for each month the individual serves.
(d) Educational, programmatic, and job skills achievement. Success-
ful completion of department-approved education, programmatic, and job
skills programs shall be awarded as follows:
Rehabilitation Achievement Credits not to Exceed
Completion of core education Forty (40) days
programming
General educational development Sixty (60) days
(GED) certificate or an equivalent
document
High school diploma or high school Ninety (90) days
equivalency diploma
Professional or trade license or One hundred ten (110) days
certificate
Associate degree One hundred twenty (120) days
Bachelor's degree One hundred eighty (180) days
Master's or professional degree One hundred eighty (180) days
(e) Education and job skills achievement credit shall be available only
to individuals who have not previously obtained the diploma, degree, or
certificate for which they seek credit prior to their current commit-
ment to the department. However, the director may award not more than
ninety (90) days of credit for each additional bachelor's, master's, or
professional degree earned by the individual. Additionally, the direc-
tor may award no more than ten (10) days of credit each month for an indi-
vidual whose diligence in labor and study merits such credits.
(2) Eligible individuals. Individuals sentenced to the department on
or after July 1, 1986, for any term other than life or a sentence of death,
including those detained in a county jail or out-of-state facility and
parolees, shall be eligible to earn credits as provided in subsection (1) of
this section beginning on the date of their judgment and sentence, subject
to the limitations set forth in subsection (7) of this section. Individuals
serving a sentence for conviction pursuant to any of the following shall not
be eligible to earn credits pursuant to this section:
(a) Crimes against children: felony injury to a child (18-1501); sex-
ual abuse of a child under the age of sixteen years (18-1506); ritual-
ized abuse of a child (18-1506A); female genital mutilation of a child
(18-1506B); sexual exploitation of a child (18-1507); lewd conduct with
a minor child under sixteen (18-1508); sexual battery of a minor child


age sixteen or seventeen years of age (18-1508A); and enticing of chil-
dren (18-1509);
(b) Battery with intent to commit serious felony against certain
classes of professionals pursuant to section 18-915(1)(a), Idaho Code;
and
(c) Murder (18-4001).
(3) Approved Programs. Programs must be approved by the department
to qualify for credit pursuant to subsection (1)(b), (c), and (d) of this
section. The director shall publish and regularly update a list of approved
programs and corresponding credits, along with guidance for successful
award of credit. Eligible individuals requesting a review of a credit award
may utilize normal grievance procedures in effect with the department.
Eligible individuals who are denied immediate admission to a department
program shall be placed on a waiting list. An individual who has been placed
on a waiting list but is transferred for non-disciplinary reasons before
beginning a program shall receive priority placement on the waiting list for
appropriate programs at the new facility.
(4) No reduction of minimum period of confinement. Credit awarded pur-
suant to subsection (1) of this section shall be applied toward a reduction
of the indeterminate period of an eligible individual's sentence or term of
felony probation or parole. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted
as reducing the minimum period of confinement required by section 19-2513,
Idaho Code. Credit shall not reduce a sentence to any period prior to the
initial parole eligibility date.
(5)(a) Forfeiture. If an eligible individual is subject to misconduct,
nonperformance, or disciplinary action, credits awarded in the last
year pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be forfeited accord-
ing to the policies and procedures developed by the department. The
decision of the director regarding forfeiture of credits shall be final
and not appealable. All credits shall be forfeited under the following
circumstances:
(i) If the individual is convicted of a new felony, including but
not limited to battery of a department or commission employee or
contractor or law enforcement officer; or
(ii) If the individual's parole is revoked for purposes other than
a technical violation.
(b) Earned credits forfeited for misconduct, nonperformance, or disci-
plinary action may be restored as provided by department policy, which
may allow for automatic restoration of sentence credits following a pe-
riod in which the individual maintains a record without a disciplinary
violation. Credits forfeited pursuant to paragraph (a)(ii) of this
subsection may be restored at the discretion of the commission.
(6) Records. The department shall make the modified sentence satis-
faction date of each eligible individual available on its website or upon
request. The modified sentence satisfaction date means the date an eligi-
ble individual would satisfy his sentence if all credits thus far awarded
to the individual pursuant to this section were applied without forfeiture.
Any credit forfeited shall no longer be counted toward the modified sentence
satisfaction date. The modified sentence satisfaction date shall be subject
to the limitations set forth in subsection (4) of this section.


(7) Pre-earned credit. The director may award credit pursuant to sub-
section (1)(a) and (d) of this section on a case-by-case basis to eligible
individuals for programs or actions undertaken during the term of incarcera-
tion up to ten (10) years prior to enactment of this section.
(8) No right of action. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as
creating a right for any individual to any credit toward a reduction of his
sentence. Any reduction credited to an individual prior to satisfying his
sentence may be forfeited, in whole or in part, by the director according to
the rules of the board. No action may be maintained against the board, any
of its members, or the director in any court in connection with the granting
or forfeiture of any credit toward a sentence reduction pursuant to this sec-
tion, and the same shall not be liable in any way for any action with respect
to the forfeiture.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.